Tennessee, session 114, SB2258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-151(c)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead the following:
(A) An LEA that installs cameras on the exterior of school buses in accordance
with subdivision (c)(1) shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with local law
enforcement that includes, but is not limited to, the review of evidence from a camera
and overall enforcement. Unless otherwise authorized by law, only POST-certified or
state-commissioned law enforcement officers, including school resource officers, as
defined in § 49-6-4202, are authorized to review evidence from a camera to determine
whether a violation of subdivision (a)(1) has occurred.
(B) In addition to, and not in limitation of, the memorandum of understanding
required in subdivision (c)(2)(A), an LEA may authorize school security personnel to
review evidence from a camera to determine whether a violation of subdivision (a)(1)
has occurred. The use of school safety personnel under this subdivision (c)(2)(B) does
not prohibit or restrict an LEA from entering into or maintaining a memorandum of
understanding with a law enforcement agency under subdivision (c)(2)(A), and both
review processes may be used concurrently. For purposes of this subdivision (c)(2)(B),
"school safety personnel" means a school safety officer, school resource officer, or other
individual employed or contracted by an LEA whose duties include student safety or
campus security.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2258
012205
- 1 -